North Carolina, session 2025, SB405.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. MEDICAID REBASE AND OTHER DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND
HUMAN SERVICES REVISIONS

MEDICAID REBASE AND MANAGED CARE ADMINISTRATION
SECTION 1.1. Section 2B.10 of S.L. 2025-89 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2B.10. SECTION 2B.10.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of six
hundred million dollars ($600,000,000) six hundred ninety million dollars ($690,000,000) in
recurring funds and associated receipts for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. receipts,
beginning with the 2025-2026 fiscal year. These funds shall be used to adjust Medicaid funding
to account for projected changes in enrollment, enrollment mix, service and capitation costs, and
federal match rates, as well as the implementation of the Children and Families Specialty Plan in
December 2025 or for contracts needed to operate the State's Medicaid managed care
program.2025.
"SECTION 2B.10.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of forty-nine million two
hundred thousand dollars ($49,200,000) in recurring funds and associated receipts, beginning
with the 2025-2026 fiscal year. There is appropriated from the ARPA Temporary Savings Fund
to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of
thirty-four million four hundred thousand dollars ($34,400,000) in nonrecurring funds and
associated receipts for the 2025-2026 fiscal year. These funds shall be used for contracts needed
to operate the State's Medicaid managed care program."

LME/MCO INTERGOVERNMENTAL TRANSFERS
SECTION 1.2.(a) The local management entities/managed care organizations
(LME/MCOs) shall make intergovernmental transfers to the Department of Health and Human
Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), in an aggregate amount of eighteen million
*S405-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
twenty-eight thousand two hundred seventeen dollars ($18,028,217) in the 2025-2026 fiscal year
and in an aggregate amount of eighteen million twenty-eight thousand two hundred seventeen
dollars ($18,028,217) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. The due date and frequency of the
intergovernmental transfer required by this section shall be determined by DHB. The amount of
the intergovernmental transfer that each individual LME/MCO is required to make in each fiscal
year shall be as follows:
2025-2026 2026-2027
Alliance Behavioral Healthcare $4,508,857 $4,508,857
Partners Health Management $3,544,348 $3,544,348
Trillium Health Resources $6,448,693 $6,448,693
Vaya Health $3,526,319 $3,526,319
SECTION 1.2.(b) In the event that a county disengages from an LME/MCO and
realigns with another LME/MCO during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, DHB shall have the
authority to reallocate the amount of the intergovernmental transfer that each affected
LME/MCO is required to make under subsection (a) of this section, taking into consideration the
change in catchment area and covered population, provided that the aggregate amount of the
transfers received from all LME/MCOs in each year of the fiscal biennium is achieved.

SINGLE-STREAM FUNDING REDUCTION
SECTION 1.3. Section 2B.5 of S.L. 2025-89 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2B.5.(a) The funds appropriated for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium
to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental
Disabilities, and Substance Use Services (DMH/DD/SUS), for single-stream funding shall be
reduced by eighteen million five hundred sixty-two thousand six hundred forty-five dollars
($18,562,645) thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) in recurring funds.funds, beginning with the
2025-2026 fiscal year.
"SECTION 2B.5.(b) During each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, each LME/MCO
shall offer at least the same level of service utilization as during the 2024-2025 fiscal year across
the LME/MCO's catchment area. This requirement shall not be construed to require LME/MCOs
to authorize or maintain the same level of services for any specific individual whose services
were paid for with single-stream funding. Further, this requirement shall not be construed to
create a private right of action for any person or entity against the State of North Carolina or the
Department of Health and Human Services or any of its divisions, agents, or contractors and shall
not be used as authority in any contested case brought pursuant to Chapter 108C or 108D of the
General Statutes."

USE OF OPIOID SETTLEMENT FUNDS
SECTION 1.4.(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) DMH/DD/SUS. – The Department of Health and Human Services, Division
of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services.
(2) Opioid Abatement Fund. – The Fund created by Section 9F.1 of S.L.
2021-180, as amended by Section 9F.1 of S.L. 2022-74.
(3) Opioid Abatement Reserve. – The Reserve created by Section 9F.1 of S.L.
2021-180, as amended by Section 9F.1 of S.L. 2022-74.
SECTION 1.4.(b) The funds appropriated from the General Fund to the
DMH/DD/SUS for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, for Single Stream Funding, are
reduced by the sum of fourteen million dollars ($14,000,000) in recurring funds.
SECTION 1.4.(c) The Prescription Digital Therapeutics Pilot Program authorized
by Section 9F.2 of S.L. 2022-74 is repealed.
SECTION 1.4.(d) The State Controller shall transfer the sum of one million eight
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,850,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year
Page 2 Senate Bill 405-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
from funds available in the Opioid Abatement Fund (as a result of the repeal of the Prescription
Digital Therapeutics Pilot Program authorized by subsection (c) of this section) to the Opioid
Abatement Reserve.
SECTION 1.4.(e) The State Controller shall transfer the sum of fourteen million
dollars ($14,000,000) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium from
funds available in the Opioid Abatement Reserve to the DMH/DD/SUS. The DMH/DD/SUS
shall use these funds to offset the reduction in Single Stream Funding authorized by subsection
(b) of this section. The funds transferred pursuant to this section are appropriated for the fiscal
year in which they are transferred.

DHHS MANDATORY VACANT POSITION ELIMINATIONS
SECTION 1.5.(a) By January 1, 2026, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall eliminate vacant positions to achieve net General Fund savings in the amount of
thirty-three million nine hundred eighty-six thousand five hundred thirty dollars ($33,986,530)
in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.
SECTION 1.5.(b) To achieve the net General Fund savings required by subsection
(a) of this section, the Department of Health and Human Services shall do one of the following:
(1) Adhere to the following schedule that sets forth the budgeted reduction to be
achieved by each division through vacant position eliminations:

FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
Division of Aging $31,474 $31,474
Division of Central Management and Support 2,994,532 2,994,532
Division of Child and Family Well-Being 1,419,611 1,419,611
Division of Child Development and Early Education 104,617 104,617
Division of Employment and Independence for 519,409 519,409
People with Disabilities
Division of Health Benefits 559,586 559,586
Division of Health Service Regulation 1,431,785 1,431,785
Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities 23,663,030 23,663,030
and Substance Use Services and Division of
State Operated Healthcare Facilities
Division of Public Health 2,028,867 2,028,867
Division of Services for the Blind and Division of 191,286 191,286
Services for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
Division of Social Services 1,042,333 1,042,333

(2) Adjust the amount of the budgeted reduction for vacant position eliminations
specified in the schedule set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection for one
or more divisions as long as the adjustment allows the Department of Health
and Human Services to achieve the net General Fund savings required by
subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 1.5.(c) The Department of Health and Human Services shall report to the
Fiscal Research Division by April 1 of each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium on the actions
taken in each division to achieve the budgeted reduction for vacant position eliminations for that
fiscal year. The report shall include a list of each position eliminated, broken down by division,
and for each position the following information:
(1) Position number.
(2) Title.
(3) The amount of salary and fringe benefits associated with the position.
Senate Bill 405-Third Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.5.(d) The funds appropriated from the General Fund for each year of
the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to the Department of Health and Human Services are reduced by
the sum of thirty-three million nine hundred eighty-six thousand five hundred thirty dollars
($33,986,530) in recurring funds.

WHOLE CHILD HEALTH SECTION REDUCTION
SECTION 1.6. The funds appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child and Family Well-Being, beginning with the
2025-2026 fiscal year, for the Whole Child Health Section, are reduced by the sum of one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in recurring funds.

MEDICAL EYE CARE PROGRAM REDUCTION
SECTION 1.7. The funds appropriated from the General Fund for each year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of
Services for the Blind, for the Medical Eye Care Program, are reduced by the sum of one hundred
ten thousand dollars ($110,000) in recurring funds.

ESTABLISH PLAN FOR MEDICAID MANAGED CARE COST-SAVINGS AND
EFFICIENCY MEASURES
SECTION 1.8.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) is
directed to develop a plan for improved health outcomes, program integrity, cost-savings, and
efficiency measures in the Medicaid program. In developing this plan, DHHS shall consult with
relevant stakeholders. The plan shall include all of the following:
(1) Reduction of DHHS administrative expenses.
(2) Flexibilities for prepaid health plans, as defined in G.S. 108D-1, to manage
service utilization and costs and align claims operations with national
standards and best practices.
(3) Improved alignment of prepaid health plan contract incentives and prepaid
health plan cost containment efforts through full risk-sharing, value-based
arrangements, and appropriate oversight of delegated care management
entities.
(4) Implementation of the plan no later than April 1, 2026.
SECTION 1.8.(b) No later than November 11, 2025, DHHS shall submit a report on
the plan for cost-savings and efficiency measures, as required in subsection (a) of this section, to
the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and the Fiscal Research Division. DHHS
shall provide monthly updates on implementation of the plan and further updates upon request
of the Chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid.

MEDICAID REDETERMINATIONS
SECTION 1.9.(a) The Office of the State Auditor shall examine the Medicaid
eligibility redetermination efforts of all county departments of social services in the State,
including the number of redeterminations conducted, the number of staff assigned to
redeterminations, and the number of vacancies in the office.
SECTION 1.9.(b) The Office of the State Auditor shall conduct a performance audit
of a sample of county departments of social services modeled after the audit required by Section
11.5 of S.L. 2015-7.
SECTION 1.9.(c) No later than April 1, 2026, the Office of the State Auditor shall
report the findings of the examination required in subsection (a) of this section and the results of
the performance audit required in subsection (b) of this section to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Medicaid and the Fiscal Research Division.
Page 4 Senate Bill 405-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.9.(d) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), the sum of one million
dollars ($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds and associated receipts to be transferred to the Office
of the State Auditor to be used for the examination and audit required by this section.
SECTION 1.9.(e) Subsection (d) of this section is retroactively effective July 1,
2025. The remainder of this section is effective when it becomes law.

PART II. CAPITAL FUNDING REVISIONS

FUTURE BUILDING RESERVES
SECTION 2.1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the funds
appropriated for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to Future Building Reserves for the building and
operating expenses of State agencies are reduced by the sum of forty-two million two hundred
six thousand nine hundred nine dollars ($42,206,909) in recurring funds for each year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium.

PART III. MISCELLANEOUS AND EFFECTIVE DATE

EFFECT OF HEADINGS
SECTION 3.1. The headings to the Parts and sections of this act are a convenience
to the reader and are for reference only. The headings do not expand, limit, or define the text of
this act.

CONSTRUCTION
SECTION 3.2. Except where expressly repealed or amended by this act, any
legislation enacted during the 2025 Regular Session expressly appropriating funds to an agency,
a department, or an institution covered under this act shall remain in effect.

STATE BUDGET ACT APPLICABILITY
SECTION 3.3. If any provision of this act and G.S. 143C-5-4 are in conflict, the
provisions of this act shall prevail. The appropriations and the authorizations to allocate and
spend funds which are set out in this act shall remain in effect until the Current Operations
Appropriations Act for the applicable fiscal year becomes law, at which time that act shall
become effective and shall govern appropriations and expenditures. When the Current
Operations Appropriations Act for that fiscal year becomes law, the Director of the Budget shall
adjust allotments to give effect to that act from July 1 of the fiscal year.

SEVERABILITY CLAUSE
SECTION 3.4. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3.5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective retroactively to
July 1, 2025.
Senate Bill 405-Third Edition Page 5